Utah statutes.
32A-13-108 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Duties to enforce this title.
(1)  It is the duty of the governor, the commissioners, the director and all
officials, inspectors, and employees of the department, all prosecuting
officials of the state and its political subdivisions and of counties, cities,
and towns, all peace officers, sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables,
marshals, law enforcement officials, state health officials, and all clerks of
the courts to diligently enforce this title in their respective capacities.
(2)  Immediately upon conviction of any person for violation of this title or
commission rules, or for violation of any local ordinance relating to
alcoholic products, it is the duty of the clerk of the court to notify the
department of the conviction in writing on forms supplied by the department.
